Washington statutes.
RCW 32.16.0901

Written notice of charges under RCW 32.16.090.

The director may serve written notice of charges under RCW 32.16.090 to suspend a person from further participation in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of a savings bank or holding company, if the director determines that such an action is necessary for the protection of the savings bank or holding company, or the interests of the depositors. Any suspension notice issued by the director is effective upon service, and unless the superior court of the county of its principal place of business issues a stay of the order, remains in effect and enforceable until:

(1) The director dismisses the charges contained in the notice served to the person; or

(2) The effective date of a final order for removal of the person under RCW 32.16.093.

[ 2010 c 88 s 52.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.